public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
tràer/coE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
trao/oJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:tràer
traerò/coJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:tràer
atràer/coE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
atraerò/coJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:atràer
atrào/oJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:atràer
astràer/coE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
astraerò/coJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:astràer
detràer/coE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
detraerò/coJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:detràer
detrào/oJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:destràer
destràer/coE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
destraerò/coJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:destràer
estraerò/coJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:estràer
estrào/oJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:estràer
kontràer/coE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kontraerò/coJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:kontràer
kontrào/oJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:kontràer
protràer/coE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
protraerò/coJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:protràer
protrào/oJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:protràer
retràer/coE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
retraerò/coJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:retràer
retrào/oJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:retràer
sotràer/coE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sotraerò/coJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:sotràer
sotrào/oJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:sotràer
